Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.01.060

Optional municipal code—This title.

References contained in this title to "Optional Municipal Code", "this title", "this code" or to any specific chapter, section, or provision thereof shall refer to the whole or appropriate part of Title 35A RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.01.060.]